District of Columbia statutes.
42-503

Fee simple estates — Absolute or qualified.

An estate in fee simple may be either absolute or qualified, as to one and his heirs during an existing condition of things of uncertain duration.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1351, ch. 854, § 1013
1981 Ed., § 45-203.
1973 Ed., § 45-803.